tools/nvda/louis/tables/ms-my-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Malay Braille Code (Grade 2)
#
#-display-name: Malay braille
#-index-name: Malay
#
#+language:ms
#+type:literary
#+contraction:full
#+grade:2
#+dots:6
# Marked as "direction:forward" by Bue Vester-Andersen
# as tests only run forward.
#+direction:forward
#
#  Copyright (C) 2019, 2020, The National Council For The Blind,
#  Malaysia, Unit 13-8, Menara Sentral Vista, No. 150 Jalan Sultan
#  Abdul Samad, Brickfields, 50470 Kuala Lumpur Malaysia
#  <info@ncbm.org.my>
#
#  Includes UEB Grade 1
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#  Maintained by Herbert Koh <kohherbert@hotmail.com>
#

repword - 123456a # put before en-ueb-g1.ctb so that it has precedence over hyphen - 36
rependword - 25,123456a
# omit caps indicator before repword indicator
noback pass2 [@6@6]@123456a ?
noback pass2 [@6]@123456a ?
noback pass2 @123456a @123456

# "kan" after repeat sign should become 345
noback pass2 @123456a-13-12456 @123456-345

include en-ueb-g1.ctb

multind 56-6 nocontractsign capsletter

# Letter A
always abaikan 1-12-1-24-345
always abdikan 1-12-145-24-345
always abjadan 1-12-245-1-145-12456
always acara 1-14-1235
always acarakan 1-14-1235-345
word ada 12356
always adaan 12356-12456
always adaankan 12356-12456-345
word adakah 12356-126
always adakan 12356-345
always adaku 12356-13-136
word adalah 12356-156
always adamu 12356-134-136
always adanya 12356-246-1
always adakala 12356-13-123
word adapun 12356-25-1234
prfword ngada 346-12356
always ngadaan 346-12356-12456
always ngadakah 346-12356-126
always ngadakan 346-12356-345
always ngadanya 346-12356-246-1
word berada 23-12356
always beradakan 23-12356-345
word mengada 34-346-12356
word mengadakah 34-346-12356-126
word mengadakan 34-346-12356-345
word seadanya 1456-12356-246-1
word terada 36-12356
always adab =
always adabkan 1-145-1-12-345
always adat =
always adatkan 1-145-1-2345-345
always adil 1-256-123
always adilkan 1-256-123-345
always adinda 1-145-35-145-1
always adindakan 1-145-35-145-1-345
always adukan 1-145-136-345
always agaikan 1-1245-1-24-345
prfword agama 1-1245-134
always agamaan 1-1245-134-12456
always agamaankan 1-1245-134-12456-345
prfword agamakah 1-1245-134-126
always agamakan 1-1245-134-345
always agamaku 1-1245-134-13-136
prfword agamalah 1-1245-134-156
always agamamu 1-1245-134-134-136
always agamanya 1-1245-134-246-1
word beragama 23-1-1245-134
word diagama 256-1-1245-134
word keagama 235-1-1245-134
word mengagama 34-346-1-1245-134
word pengagama 1256-346-1-1245-134
word peragama 356-1-1245-134
word seagama 1456-1-1245-134
always agendakan 1-1245-26-145-1-345
always agensikan 1-1245-26-234-24-345
always agikan 1-1245-24-345
always agukan 1-1245-136-345
always ah 1246
word ah =
word aha =
always aham 1-125-2346
always ahama 1-125-1-134-1
always ahaman 1-125-2346-12456
always ahamkan 1-125-2346-345
always ahari 1-45-125
word ahli 1246
word ahlian 1246-25-12456
word ahliankan 1246-25-12456-345
word ahlikah 1246-25-126
word ahlikan 1246-25-345
word ahliku 1246-25-13-136
word ahlilah 1246-25-156
word ahlimu 1246-25-134-136
word ahlinya 1246-25-246-1
word berahli 23-25-1246
always berahlikah 23-25-1246-25-126
always berahlikan 23-25-1246-25-345
always berahlilah 23-25-1246-25-156
always berahlinya 23-25-1246-25-246-1
word diahli 256-25-1246
always diahlikan 256-25-1246-25-345
always keahlian 235-25-1246-25-12456
always keahliankan 235-25-1246-25-12456-345
always keberahlian 235-23-25-1246-25-12456
always keberahliankan 235-23-25-1246-25-12456-345
word mengahli 34-346-25-1246
always mengahlikan 34-346-25-1246-25-345
always pengahlian 1256-346-25-1246-25-12456
always pengahliankan 1256-346-25-1246-25-12456-345
always perahlian 356-25-1246-25-12456
always perahliankan 356-25-1246-25-12456-345
word seahli 1456-25-1246
always seahlikan 1456-25-1246-25-345

always ajukan 1-245-136-345
word akan 1-345
word akankah 1-345-126
word akanku 1-345-13-136
word akanlah 1-345-156
word akanmu 1-345-134-136
word akannya 1-345-246-1
word seakan 1456-1-345
word seakankah 1456-1-345-126
always seakanku 1456-1-345-13-136
word seakanlah 1456-1-345-156
always seakanmu 1456-1-345-134-136
always seakannya 1456-1-345-246-1
always akhtakan 1-16-2345-1-345
always aksara 1-13-234-1235
always aksarakan 1-13-234-1235-345
always aksikan 1-13-234-24-345
always aktakan 1-13-2345-1-345
always akukan 1-13-136-345
always alah 1-156
always alahai =
always alahkan 1-156-345
always alamat =
always alamatkan 1-123-1-134-1-2345-345
always am 2346
always ama =
word amal 1-134-1-123
always amalan 1-134-1-123-12456
always amalkah 1-134-1-123-126
always amalkan 1-134-1-123-345
always amalku 1-134-1-123-13-136
always amallah 1-134-1-123-156
always amalmu 1-134-1-123-134-136
always amalnya 1-134-1-123-246-1
word beramal 23-1-134-1-123
always beramalan 23-1-134-1-123-12456
always beoamalkah 23-1-134-1-123-126
always beramalkan 23-1-134-1-123-345
always beramallah 23-1-134-1-123-156
always beramalnya 23-1-134-1-123-246-1
word diamal 256-1-134-1-123
always diamalkah 256-1-134-1-123-126
always diamalkan 256-1-134-1-123-345
always diamalku 256-1-134-1-123-13-136
always diamallah 256-1-134-1-123-156
always diamalku 256-1-134-1-123-13-136
always diamalnya 256-1-134-1-123-246-1
always keamalan 256-1-134-1-123-12456
always keamalankan 256-1-134-1-123-12456-345
always mengamal 34-346-1-134-1-123
always mengamalkan 34-346-1-134-1-123-345
always pengamal 1256-346-1-134-1-123
always seamalan 1456-1-134-1-123-12456
always teramal 36-1-134-1-123
always teoamalkan 36-1-134-1-123-345
always amam 1-134-2346
word aman 1-134-12456
word amankah 1-134-12456-126
always amankan 1-134-12456-345
word amanku 1-134-12456-13-136
word amankukah 1-134-12456-13-136-126
word amankulah 1-134-12456-13-136-156
word amanlah 1-134-12456-156
word amanmu 1-134-12456-134-136
word amanmukah 1-134-12456-134-136-126
word amanmulah 1-134-12456-134-136-156
word amannya 1-134-12456-246-1
word amannyakah 1-134-12456-246-1-126
word amannyalah 1-134-12456-246-1-156
word beraman 23-1-134-12456
always beramanan 23-1-134-12456-12456
always beramankah 23-1-134-12456-126
always beramankan 23-1-134-12456-345
always beramanlah 23-1-134-12456-156
always beramannya 23-1-134-12456-246-1
always diamankan 256-1-134-12456-345
always keamanan 235-1-134-12456-12456
always keamanankan 235-1-134-12456-12456-345
word mengaman 34-346-1-134-12456
always mengamankan 34-346-1-134-12456-345
always pengaman 1256-346-1-134-12456
always pengamankan 1256-346-1-134-12456-345
word seaman 1456-1-134-12456
word teraman 36-1-134-12456
word teramankah 36-1-134-12456-126
word teramanlah 36-1-134-12456-156
always teramannya 36-1-134-12456-246-1
begword aman 1-134-12456
endword aman 2346-12456
begword amang 1-134-1-346
always amanah 1-134-1-1345-1246
always amanahkan 1-134-1-1345-1246-345
always amanat =
always amanatkan 1-134-1-1345-1-2345-345
always amang 1-134-1-346
always amangkan 1-134-1-346-345
always amar =
always amarkan 1-134-1-1235-345
word amat =
always amati =
always amatkah 1-134-1-2345-126
always amatkan 1-134-1-2345-345
always amatku 1-134-1-2345-13-136
always amatlah 1-134-1-2345-156
always amatmu 1-134-1-2345-134-136
always amatnya 1-134-1-2345-246-1
always keamat 235-1-134-1-2345
always pengamat 1256-346-1-134-1-2345
always teramat 36-1-134-1-2345
always diameter 256-1-34-2345-15-1235
always diameterkan 256-1-34-2345-15-1235-345
word amin 1-134-35
prfword aminkah 1-134-35-126
always aminkan 1-134-35-345
always aminku 1-134-35-13-136
prfword aminlah 1-134-35-156
always aminmu 1-134-35-134-136
always aminnya 1-134-35-246-1
always aminah 1-134-24-1345-1246
always ambang 5-2346
always ambangkan 5-2346-345
always ambil 45-2346
always ambilkan 45-2346-345
always diambil 256-45-2346
always diambilkan 256-45-2346-345
begword ame 1-34
always amerika 1-34-1235-24-13-1
begword ami =
midword ami =
word amnya 2346-25-246-1
always amo =
always ampai 456-2346
always ampaikan 456-2346-345
always ampukan 2346-1234-136-345
always amukan 1-134-136-13-12456
always amun =
always amunkan 1-134-136-1345-345
always amung 1-134-136-346
always amungkan 1-134-136-346-345
always amy =
always an 12456
word ana =
word anakah 1-1345-1-126
word anakan 1-1345-1-13-12456
word analah 1-1345-1-156
begmidword ana =
always anak =
always anakkan 1-1345-1-13-345
always anakandakan 1-1345-1-13-12456-145-1-345
always anam 1-1345-2346
always anamkan 1-1345-2346-345
always anasir 1-1345-1-234-24-1235
always anasirkan 1-1345-1-234-24-1235-345
word anda 12456
